Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 8. General Provisions.

Sec. 17.20.340.
Scope of provisions dealing with sale.

The provisions of this chapter regarding the sale of food, drugs, devices, or cosmetics include the manufacture, production, processing, packing, exposure, offer, possession, and holding of them for sale; the sale, dispensing, and giving of them, and the supplying or applying of them in the conduct of a food, drug, or cosmetic establishment.

History.

(§ 2(q) ch 129 SLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For milk and milk products, see 18 AAC 32, art. 1.

Sec. 17.20.345.
Liability of food donor.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

17.20.290

,

17.20.305

, or

17.20.315

, a donor of food for free distribution by a food bank or charitable organization is not subject to civil or criminal liability arising from an injury or death attributable to the condition of the donated food if the injury or death is not a result of the gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct of the donor.

Nothing in this section, AS

17.20.290

,

17.20.305

,

17.20.315

, or AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

prohibits the donation by a donor of food apparently fit for human consumption at the time of its donation solely because

the label on the food is missing or the food is otherwise misbranded; this paragraph does not apply to the label required under (d)(2) of this section;

the food, if offered for sale commercially, would not be readily marketable because of appearance or grade, or because it is surplus; or

a date on the food indicating when the food is best eaten by or used by has expired.

A person who donates to a food bank or charitable organization salmon from a hatchery that operates under a permit issued under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

is immune from liability as provided in this section if the salmon is apparently fit for human consumption at the time of its donation, even if the hatchery does not have a permit issued by the Department of Environmental Conservation under this chapter or other statute to process fisheries products for human consumption.

A donor of unsold hot food to a food bank or charitable organization is immune from liability as provided in this section if

at the time the food is donated, the food is apparently fit for human consumption;

the donor labels the food with a statement that reads “This food has been previously heated. Best if kept frozen until ready to eat.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1995; am § 22 ch 72 SLA 1998; am §§ 8, 9 ch 151 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 1 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective June 4, 2018, in (a), inserted “or charitable organization” following “a food bank”; in (b), in (b)(1), added “this paragraph does not apply to the label required under (d)(2) of this section;” at the end, added (b)(3), and made related changes; in (c), inserted “or charitable organization” following “a food bank”; added (d).

Sec. 17.20.346.
Liability of food bank or charitable organization.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

17.20.290

,

17.20.305

, or

17.20.315

, a food bank or charitable organization that receives and distributes food is not subject to civil or criminal liability arising from an injury or death attributable to the condition of the food if

the food bank or charitable organization inspects the food received in a reasonable manner and finds it to be apparently fit for human consumption at the time of distribution;

the food bank or charitable organization has no actual or constructive knowledge at the time the food is distributed that it is adulterated, tainted, contaminated, or would be harmful to the health or well-being of an individual consuming it; and

the injury or death is not a direct result of the negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct of the food bank or charitable organization.

Nothing in this section, AS

17.20.290

,

17.20.305

,

17.20.315

, or AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

prohibits the distribution by a food bank or charitable organization of food apparently fit for human consumption at the time of its distribution solely because

the label on the food is missing or the food is otherwise misbranded;

the food, if sold commercially, would not be readily marketable because of appearance or grade, or because it is surplus; or

a date on the food indicating when the food is best eaten by or used by has expired.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1984; am § 23 ch 72 SLA 1998; am § 10 ch 151 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 1 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective June 4, 2018, inserted “or charitable organization” following “food bank” throughout the section; added (b)(3), and made a related change.

Sec. 17.20.347.
Definitions.

In AS

17.20.345

—

17.20.347

,

“charitable organization” means a nonprofit organization that provides food without charge to individuals who do not have money to pay for the food or who do not have homes;

“donor” includes a person, farmer, retailer, delicatessen, restaurant, hotel, store, slaughterhouse under state supervision, freight company, distributor, wholesaler, meat processor, seafood processor, or similar entity, and a person who acts in a commercial capacity as a manufacturer, packer, processor, bottler, or similar entity, even if that activity is the person’s primary activity;

“food” includes unsold hot food;

“food bank” means a nonprofit organization that operates principally to collect, inspect, and salvage donated food for free distribution either to needy persons or to nonprofit organizations for free distribution to needy persons.

“nonprofit organization” means an organization recognized by the state or federal government as a nonprofit organization.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 16 SLA 1995; am §§ 4, 5 ch 1 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraphs (1) and (3) were enacted as (3) and (4); renumbered in 2018, at which time other paragraphs were renumbered to maintain alphabetical consistency.

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective June 4, 2018, in (2), inserted “delicatessen, restaurant, hotel, store,” following “retailer”; in (4), deleted “; in this paragraph, ‘nonprofit organization’ means an organization recognized by the state or federal government as a nonprofit organization” at the end; added (3) [now (1)], (4) [now 3], and (5).

Sec. 17.20.350.
Report of minor violations.

Nothing in this chapter requires either the commissioner of environmental conservation or the commissioner of health and social services, as the case may be, to report minor violations of their respective portions of this chapter for prosecution, or for the institution of libel or injunction proceedings, when that commissioner believes that the public interest will be adequately served by a suitable written notice or warning.

History.

(§ 8 ch 129 SLA 1949; am E.O. No. 51, § 32 (1981))

Sec. 17.20.360.
Attorney general to prosecute.

The attorney general, to whom the commissioner of environmental conservation or the commissioner of health and social services, as the case may be, reports a violation of this chapter, shall institute appropriate proceedings in the superior court without delay and prosecute them in the manner required by law.

History.

(§ 7 ch 129 SLA 1949; am E.O. No. 51, § 3 (1981); am § 11 ch 151 SLA 2004)

Sec. 17.20.365.
Additional enforcement powers, penalties, and remedies.

In addition to the enforcement powers, penalties, and remedies available under this chapter, the enforcement powers, penalties, and remedies under AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

may be used, where appropriate, to enforce this chapter.

History.

(§ 12 ch 151 SLA 2004)

Sec. 17.20.370.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“advertisement” means a representation disseminated, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or which is likely to induce directly or indirectly the purchase of food, drugs, devices, or cosmetics;

“aquatic farm” has the meaning given in AS

16.40.199

;

“aquatic farm product” has the meaning given in AS

16.40.199

;

“contaminated with filth” means food, drug, device, or cosmetic not securely protected from dust, dirt, and as far as necessary by all reasonable means, from foreign or injurious contamination;

“cosmetic” means an article intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance, and an article intended for use as a component of an article enumerated in this paragraph; except that the term does not include soap intended for cleansing purposes only;

“device” except when used in AS

17.20.040(a)(6)

,

17.20.090

(3),

17.20.150

(3),

17.20.290(a)(10)

and

17.20.300

means an instrument, apparatus, and contrivance, including its components, parts, and accessories, intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or animal; or to affect the structure or function of the body of man or animal;

“drug” means an article recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National Formulary; an article intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or animal; an article other than food, intended to affect the structure or function of the body of man or animal; and an article intended for use as component of an article specified in this paragraph but does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories;

“federal act” means the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 301 — 392; 52 Stat. 1040 — 1059;

“fish or fisheries products” means any aquatic animal, including amphibians, or aquatic plants or parts of those plants, animals, or amphibians that are usable as human food;

“food” means an article used for food or drink for man or animal, chewing gum, and articles used for components of either of them;

“immediate container” does not include a package liner;

“label” means a display of written, printed or graphic matter upon the immediate container of an article; however, a requirement made by or under authority of this chapter that a word, statement, or other information appear on the label is not complied with unless the word, statement, or other information also appears on the outside container or wrapper of the retail package, if there is one, or is easily legible through the outside container or wrapper;

“labeling” means the label and other written, printed, or graphic matter upon an article or its container or wrapper accompanying the article;

“new drug” means a drug the composition of which is such that it is not generally recognized among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate the safety of drugs as safe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling of it; or a drug the composition of which is such that the drug, as a result of investigations to determine its safety for use under such conditions, has become so recognized, but which has not, otherwise than in these investigations, been used to a material extent or for a material time under those conditions;

“official compendium” means the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, official National Formulary, or supplements to them.

History.

(§ 2(a) — (k) (m) — (p) (r) ch 129 SLA 1949; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 14 ch 208 SLA 1975; am E.O. No. 51, § 41 (1981); am § 2 ch 164 SLA 1990; am §§ 24, 25 ch 72 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 8 SLA 2002; am § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was reorganized in 1983 to alphabetize the words defined and in 1990, 1998, 2010, and 2019 to retain alphabetical order.

In 2002, in paragraph (7) [now (6)] of this section, “
AS

17.20.040

(a)(6)” was substituted for “
AS

17.20.040

(6)” to reflect the 2002 addition of subsection (b) to
AS 17.20.040.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, repealed (2).

Sec. 17.20.380.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1949)